Delaware, session 153, HB75.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 8145, Title 10 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8145. Civil suits for damages based upon sexual abuse of a minor by an adult. (a) A cause of action based upon the sexual abuse of a minor by an adult may be filed in the Superior Court of this State at any time following the commission of the act or acts that constituted the sexual abuse. A civil cause of action for sexual abuse of a minor shall be based upon sexual acts that would constitute a criminal offense under the Delaware Code. (b) For a period of 2 years following July 9, 2007, victims of child sexual abuse that occurred in this State who have been barred from filing suit against their abusers by virtue of the expiration of the former civil statute of limitations, shall be permitted to file those claims in the Superior Court of this State. If the person committing the act of sexual abuse against a minor was employed by an institution, agency, firm, business, corporation, or other public or private legal entity that owned a duty of care to the victim, or the accused and the minor were engaged in some activity over which the legal entity had some degree of responsibility or control, damages against the legal entity shall be awarded under this subsection only if there is a finding of gross negligence on the part of the legal entity. Victims of child sexual abuse who have been barred from filing a cause of action based upon the sexual abuse of a minor by an adult by virtue of the expiration of a civil statute of limitation, notice of claim, presentation deadline, or any other time limit that had expired, or for which a final judgment was rendered based on the expiration of any time limitation or other procedural bases, are permitted to file those claims Â in the Superior Court at any time. (c) No action relating to the sexual abuse of a minor by an adult that is filed or pending after [the effective date of this act] may be dismissed by virtue of the expiration of a civil statute of limitations. (d) This section appliesÂ to anyÂ actions for damages against any person, institution, public or private entity, including any charitable organization, educational institution, hospital, and the government.Â The State waives sovereign immunity in a cause of action based upon the sexual abuse of a minor by an adult. (c) (e) A person against whom a suit is filed may recover attorneysâ fees where the Court determines that a false accusation was made with no basis in fact and with malicious intent. A verdict in favor of the accused shall not be the sole basis for a determination that an accusation was false. The Court must make an independent finding of an improper motive to award attorneysâ fees under this section. SYNOPSIS A victim of child sexual abuse that occurred in this State who has been barred from filing suit against the victimâs abuser by virtue of the expiration of a former civil statute of limitations are permitted to file these claims in the Superior Court of this state at any time. This is intended to apply retroactively.